Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 198A Low-Cost Housing
198A.065.
Waiver of income — Eligibility requirements.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky hereby finds and determines that in order to provide for the greatest possible participation by the corporation in programs for the insurance or guarantee of mortgage loans for the construction or rehabilitation of residential housing projects by the United States of America, or an agency or instrumentality thereof; or by any other entity, including private mortgage insurance, which has been duly approved for these loans by the United States of America or by the Commonwealth or any agency or instrumentality thereof, if the criteria for state approval are specified in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A by the state agency granting the approval; or for mortgage loans that are insured or reinsured by the corporation under KRS 198A.040(25), it is appropriate and proper that there be provision by which the maximum amounts of income for persons and families of lower and moderate income established by this chapter may be waived in certain circumstances so that the corporation may insure or reinsure mortgage loans or qualify for insurance or guarantee of mortgage loans.

Notwithstanding the requirements of KRS 198A.010(14), 198A.060(1), or any other provisions of law to the contrary, the corporation may, by action of its board of directors, suspend or terminate any income-eligibility requirements established by this chapter, subject to subsection (3) of this section, upon written request of any private mortgage insurance company or any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America which has insured or guaranteed mortgage loans made by the corporation for the construction or rehabilitation of a specific residential housing project or for any mortgage loan insured or reinsured by the corporation under KRS 198A.040(25), upon a finding by the board of directors of the existence of one (1) or more of the following conditions with respect to that project:

Serious rental or occupancy problems which threaten the financial stability of the project, defined as a project which cannot meet its debt service obligation from available rental income; or

A default as to one (1) or more of the terms of the mortgage loan; or

A foreclosure of the mortgage loan; or

A conveyance of real estate by a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

If the corporation suspends or terminates income eligibility requirements relating to a project financed by a loan which is insured or guaranteed by a private mortgage insurance company or the corporation, the corporation shall file with the Legislative Research Commission notice of, and an explanation of the need for, the suspension or termination. The Commission shall refer the notice and explanation to the appropriate interim joint subcommittee for review. The corporation shall also provide to the reviewing subcommittee information relating to the management of, and plans for, the project.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 215, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 310, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2011, ch. 23, § 3, effective March 15, 2011.

198A.067.
Ordinance required for financing for certain multifamily housing. [Repealed.]

198A.070.
State not liable for obligations of the Kentucky Housing Corporation.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the corporation. Each obligation issued under this chapter shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the corporation shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon except from the revenues or assets pledged therefor and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligation.

Expenses incurred by the corporation in carrying out the provisions of this chapter may be made payable from funds provided pursuant to this chapter and no liability shall be incurred by the corporation hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been so provided.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 8.

198A.080.
Housing development fund — Use to include repair of existing housing.

There is hereby created and established a loan fund to be known as the housing development fund and to be administered by the corporation as a trust fund separate and distinct from all other moneys, funds, or assets administered by the corporation.

The housing development fund shall be comprised of and the corporation is hereby authorized to receive and accept for the housing development fund the proceeds of grants, contributions, appropriations, repayment of loans made from the fund, the proceeds of fund notes, and any other moneys which may be made available to the corporation for the purposes of the housing development fund from any other source. The corporation is hereby authorized to receive and accept from any source whatever any grants or contributions for the housing development fund. The corporation is authorized to provide for the issuance, at one (1) time or from time to time, of housing development fund notes for the purpose of providing funds for such fund; provided, however, that not more than $5,000,000 fund notes or other borrowings shall be outstanding at any one (1) time. The principal of and the interest on any such fund notes shall be payable solely from the housing development fund. The fund notes of each issue shall be dated, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding ten (10) years from their date or dates, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the corporation, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be determined by the corporation. The corporation shall determine the form and manner of execution of the fund notes, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be any bank or trust company within or without the state or any agent, including the lender. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any fund notes or coupons attached thereto shall cease to be such officer before the delivery thereof, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The fund notes may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the corporation may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon fund notes as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon fund notes of any fund notes registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon fund notes. Any such fund notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the corporation and may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as the corporation shall determine to be for the best interest of the corporation and best effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

The proceeds of any fund notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the corporation may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such fund notes. The corporation may provide for the replacement of any fund notes which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.

Fund notes may be issued under the provisions of this section without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this chapter and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such fund notes.

The purpose of the housing development fund is to provide a source from which the corporation may make loans and grants, and the corporation is authorized to make loans and grants from the housing development fund, at such interest rate or rates and such term or terms as may be determined by the corporation to be for the best interest of the corporation and best effectuate the purpose of this chapter, and with such security for repayment as the corporation deems reasonably necessary and practicable, to:

Defray development costs of sponsors, builders, and developers of residential housing, or

Provide to persons and families of lower and moderate income who are applying for mortgages, either for purchase or rehabilitation of residential housing the amounts required to make down payments, pay closing costs, or make interest payments, or

Make or participate in the making of construction loans which are not federally insured to sponsors, builders, and developers of land development or residential housing; provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the determination by the corporation that construction loans are not otherwise available, wholly or in part, from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions.

No temporary loans shall be made by the corporation from the housing development fund except in accordance with a written agreement which shall include, without limitation, the following terms and conditions:

The proceeds of such loan shall be used only for the purpose for which such loan shall have been made as provided in the agreement;

Such loan shall be repaid in full as provided in the agreement;

All repayments in connection with a loan to defray development costs shall be made concurrent with receipt by the borrower of the proceeds of a construction loan or mortgage loan, as the case may be, or at such other times as the corporation deems reasonably necessary or practicable; and

Such security for repayment shall be specified and shall be upon such terms and conditions as the corporation deems reasonably necessary or practicable to insure all repayments.

No funds from the housing development fund shall be used to carry on propaganda or otherwise attempt to influence legislation.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the corporation may make loans secured by a mortgage from the housing development fund to enable a person sixty-two (62) years of age or older who owns the home in which he resides, whose income combined with his spouse does not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000), and who meets any other reasonable standards established by the corporation to make repairs to his home including but not limited to siding, weatherstripping, roofing, gutters, electrical wiring, plumbing, and installation of sewers.
(8) (a)

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the corporation may make loans secured by a mortgage from the housing development fund to enable a person sixty-two (62) years of age or older who owns the home in which he resides, whose income combined with his spouse does not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000), and who meets any other reasonable standards established by the corporation to make repairs to his home including but not limited to siding, weatherstripping, roofing, gutters, electrical wiring, plumbing, and installation of sewers.

The maximum principal amount of such loans shall not exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000) and the maximum interest rate shall not exceed three percent (3%). All loans shall be repayable over a period of thirty (30) years. Upon the death of the borrowers prior to maturity, the unpaid balance shall be paid in full by the person to whom the house has passed by devise or descent.

The corporation shall make loans under this section in an equal number in each of the six (6) congressional districts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 9; 1974, ch. 383, § 5; 1976, ch. 364, § 4; 1980, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 99, § 6, effective March 23, 1982; 1982, ch. 182, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 235, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

198A.090.
Corporate authorization and operation of revenue bond financing — Approval of General Assembly required for certain bond or note issuances.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the corporation may provide for the issuance, at one (1) time or from time to time, of bonds of the corporation if the cumulative outstanding indebtedness of the corporation’s bonds does not exceed five billion dollars ($5,000,000,000), in order to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes and powers.

In anticipation of the issuance of bonds, the corporation may provide for the issuance, at one (1) time or from time to time, of bond anticipation notes. The principal of and the interest on the bonds or notes shall be payable solely from the funds provided for the payment. Notes may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or, if bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, notes may be paid from any available revenues or assets of the corporation.

The bonds or notes of each issue shall be dated and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the corporation at a price and under terms and conditions determined by the corporation. Bonds or notes shall bear interest at a rate determined by the corporation. Notes shall mature at a time not exceeding ten (10) years from their date and bonds shall mature at a time not exceeding forty (40) years from their date, as determined by the corporation. The corporation shall determine the form and manner of execution of the bonds or notes, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination and the place of payment of principal and interest, which may be any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth. If an officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds, notes, or coupons attached to them shall cease to be an officer before the delivery thereof, the signature or facsimile shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until delivery. The corporation may provide for the authentication of the bonds or notes by a trustee or fiscal agent. The bonds or notes may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the corporation may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds or notes as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds or notes of any bonds or notes registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds or notes. Upon the approval of a resolution of the corporation, authorizing the sale of its bonds or notes, the bonds or notes may be sold in a manner, either at public or private sale, and for a price the corporation shall determine to be for the best interest of the corporation and best effectuate the purposes of this chapter, if the sale is approved by the corporation.

The proceeds of any bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which they are issued and shall be disbursed in the manner and under the restrictions, if any, the corporation may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or notes or in the trust agreement securing the same.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the corporation may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. The corporation may also provide for the replacement of any bonds or notes which become mutilated, destroyed, or lost.

Prior to the issuance of any bonds or notes that are not secured by:
(6) (a)

Prior to the issuance of any bonds or notes that are not secured by:

Direct obligations or obligations guaranteed by the United States of America; or

Obligations of federal agencies to the extent that the obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America; or

Repurchase agreements with any primary dealer in securities fully secured by obligations described in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph if the market value of the security is maintained at one hundred three percent (103%) of the principal amount of the repurchase agreement and the security is held by an independent third-party custodian financial institution; or

Insured or guaranteed construction loans or mortgage loans as defined by KRS 198A.010(10) and (11); or

Guaranty insurance policies which guarantee payment of the principal and interest on the bonds issued by a nationally recognized entity authorized to issue guarantees and rated in the highest rating category by at least one (1) of the nationally recognized rating services;

The corporation may provide for the issuance, at any one (1) time or from time to time, of bonds which do not satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection without approval of the issuance by the General Assembly if the cumulative outstanding indebtedness of the corporation that does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection does not exceed thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

The corporation shall annually report on its housing and bonding programs to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide to the corporation fiscal consultant services regarding revenue bond management as necessary.

the corporation shall obtain the approval of the issuance from the General Assembly in accordance with the provisions of KRS 56.870(1), unless the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection apply. This requirement shall not apply to refunding bond or note issues which are for the purpose of achieving debt service savings and which do not extend the term of the refunded bonds or notes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1974, ch. 383, § 6; 1976, ch. 310, § 1; 1978, ch. 220, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 99, § 7, effective March 23, 1982; 1992, ch. 365, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 53, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 76, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 23, § 4, effective March 15, 2011.

198A.100.
Trust agreement to secure corporate obligations — Operation thereof.

In the discretion of the corporation any obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the corporation and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations may pledge or assign all or any part of the revenues or assets of the corporation, including, without limitation, mortgage loans, mortgage loan commitments, construction loans, temporary loans, contracts, agreements and other security or investment obligations, the fees or charges made or received by the corporation, the moneys received in payment of loans and interest thereon, and any other moneys received or to be received by the corporation. Such trust agreement or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of any such obligations as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the corporation in relation to the purposes to which obligation proceeds may be applied, the disposition or pledging of the revenues or assets of the corporation, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional obligations, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state which may act as depository of the proceeds of obligations, revenues or other money hereunder to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the corporation. Any such trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any obligations and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by any such holders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the corporation may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the holders of any obligations. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be paid from the revenues or assets pledged or assigned to the payment of the principal of and the interest on obligations or from any other funds available to the corporation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 11.

198A.110.
Pledge of corporate assets on obligations of the corporation.

The pledge of any assets or revenues of the corporation to the payment of the principal of or the interest on any obligations of the corporation shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made and any such assets or revenues shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the corporation, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the corporation from selling any assets subject to any such pledge except to the extent that any such sale may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 12.

198A.120.
All moneys received are trust funds and may be temporarily invested.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all moneys received pursuant to the authority of this chapter shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The resolution authorizing any obligations or the trust agreement securing the same may provide that any of such moneys may be temporarily invested pending the disbursement thereof and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this chapter and such resolution or trust agreement may provide. Any such moneys or any other moneys of the corporation may be invested as provided in KRS 386.020.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 13.

198A.130.
Holders of corporate obligations granted legal rights to enforce duties of the corporation.

Any holder of obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter or any coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such obligations, except the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or resolution, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the corporation pursuant to this chapter, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the corporation or by any officer thereof.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 14.

198A.140.
Declaration of negotiability of obligations of the corporation.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this chapter or any recitals in any obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter, all such obligations and interest coupons appertaining thereto shall be and are hereby made negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, subject only to any applicable provisions for registration.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 15.

198A.150.
Obligations of Kentucky Housing Corporation are authorized investments.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes or obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 16.

198A.160.
Authorization for issuance of refunding obligations.

The corporation is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations and, if deemed advisable by the corporation, for any corporate purpose of the corporation. The issuance of such obligations, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the corporation in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter which relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate therefor.

Refunding obligations may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this chapter and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption or payment of such outstanding obligations. Pending the application of the proceeds of any such refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing the same, to the payment of any interest on such refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America which shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 17.

198A.165.
Authorization for establishing reserve and replacement funds.

The corporation shall be authorized and empowered in connection with the issuance of its bonds and notes for housing purposes pursuant to this chapter to establish in respect of such bonds and notes such reserve funds or replacement funds as may be required in the sound discretion of the board of directors of the corporation to enable the corporation to effectuate its proper public purposes. In the event any such reserve fund or replacement fund created by the corporation in connection with any such bond issue or note issue should, in violation of any contract made by the corporation with any bondholder or note holder be monetarily deficient in any respect as of any date of accounting so stipulated by the corporation, the corporation shall immediately make formal request in writing to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and to the Governor of Kentucky that sums adequate to restore such reserve fund or replacement fund to its contractually required level and to pay any overdue principal and interest on any outstanding bonds and notes of the corporation be included in the next succeeding executive budget, and that such budget request with recommendation for approval by the General Assembly to the corporation for the use and benefit of such reserve fund or replacement fund. In the event the next scheduled even-numbered-year regular session of the General Assembly of Kentucky shall occur more than six (6) months after any such request by the corporation, the corporation shall request that sums adequate to restore such reserve fund or replacement fund to such contractually required level and to pay any overdue principal and interest on any outstanding bonds and notes of the corporation be made available from the Governor’s contingency fund, and if such funds are so made available the budget request hereinabove described in this section shall be correspondingly reduced.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 383, § 8; 2001, ch. 58, § 27, effective June 21, 2001.

198A.170.
Annual report and annual audit.

The corporation shall, promptly following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor and the General Assembly. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement of the corporation during the year. The housing fund shall also cause an annual audit to be made by a resident independent certified public accountant of its books, accounts, and records, with respect to its receipts, disbursements, contracts, mortgages, leases, assignments, loans and all other matters relating to its financial operations. The persons performing such audit shall furnish copies of the audit report to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, where they shall be placed on file and made available for inspection by the general public.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 18; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2).

198A.180.
Limitation of liability for corporate members or officers.

No member or other officer of the corporation shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any obligations or the issuance thereof.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 19.

198A.190.
Authority to accept and expend funds.

The corporation is authorized to accept and expend such moneys as may be appropriated from time to time by the General Assembly or such moneys as may be received from any source including income from the corporation’s operations, for effectuating its corporate purposes including, without limitation, the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation and the establishment of a reserve or contingency fund to be available for the payment of the principal of and the interest on any bonds or notes of the corporation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 20; 1974, ch. 383, § 7.

198A.200.
Tax exempt status.

The Kentucky Housing Corporation has been duly created as a de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Accordingly, the Kentucky Housing Corporation shall not be required to pay any taxes and assessments to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any county, municipality or other governmental subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, upon any of its property or upon its obligations or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or upon any moneys, funds, revenues or other income held or received by the corporation and the notes and bonds of the corporation and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation, except for death and gift taxes and taxes of transfers; provided, however, that real property owned by the Kentucky Housing Corporation shall be exempt from all property taxation and special assessments of the state or political subdivisions thereof, but the corporation may agree to pay, in lieu of such taxes, such amounts as the corporation finds consistent with the cost to the state or political subdivision of supplying municipal services to the housing development and maintaining the economic feasibility of the housing development, which payments such bodies are hereby authorized to accept.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 21; 1974, ch. 383, § 9; 1976, ch. 200, § 4.

198A.210.
Disclosure of conflict of interest of member, officer, or employee of the corporation.

If any member, officer, or employee of the corporation shall be interested either directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested directly or indirectly in any contract with the corporation, including any loan to any sponsor, builder, or developer, such interest shall be disclosed to the corporation and shall be set forth in the minutes of the corporation, and the member, officer, or employee having such interest therein shall not participate on behalf of the corporation in the authorization of any such contract.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 22.

198A.220.
Provisions of this chapter deemed to be supplemental powers to other laws.

The foregoing sections of this chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that the issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds or notes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 23.

198A.230.
Disposition of corporation assets upon termination or dissolution.

Upon termination or dissolution, all rights and properties of the corporation shall pass to and be vested in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, subject to the rights of lienholders and other creditors, unless the board of directors directs at such times that they be distributed among one or more corporations, trusts, community chests, funds or foundations organized and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder, member or individual and no substantial part of whose activities consists of carrying on propaganda, or otherwise attempting to influence legislation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 24.

198A.240.
Title of chapter.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mae Street Kidd Kentucky Housing Corporation Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 70, § 1; 1974, ch. 50, § 1.